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DI3RY-01

DTC P 1700/61| Speed SensorNo.2CircuitMalfunction
(No.2 Speed Sensor)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The No.2 speed sensor detects the rotation speed of the transmission output shaft and sends signals to the
Engine and ECT ECU. The Engine and ECT ECU determines the vehicle speed based on these signals.
An AC voltage is generated in the No.2 speed sensor coil as the rotor mounted on the output shaft rotates,
and this voltage is sent to the Engine and ECT ECU.

Thegearshiftpointandlock  -uptimingare controlled by the Engineand ECT ECU based onthe signals
from this speed sensor and the throttle position sensor signal.

If the No.2 speed sensor malfunctions, the Engine and ECT ECU uses input signals from the No.1 speed
sensorasaback -upsignal.
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DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

All conditions below are detected 500 times or more continu-
ously.
2 trip detection logic
(2 trip . I gic) o ) * Openorshortin No.2 speed sensor circuit
(a) No signal from No.2 speed sensor is input to Engine and
P1700/61 ECT while 4 pulses of No.1 speed sensor signal are sent *No.2speed sensor

) P 1 sP 9 ' *Engineand ECTECU
(b) Vehicle speed: 9 km/h (5.6 mph) or more for at least 4 se-
conds

(c) Neutral start switch: OFF (Other than P or N)
HINT:

' § Refertothe chartforthe wave from between terminals SP2
andSP2 whenvehicle speedis approx. 60 km/h (37 mph).
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1

Check vehicle speed value or resistance between terminals SP2” and SP2” of
Engine and ECT ECU.

When using hand-held tester:

PREPARATION:

(@ Remove the DLC3 cover.

(b) Connect a hand-held tester to the DLC3.

(c) Start the engine and turn the hand-held tester main
switch ON.

CHECK:

Drive the vehicle and read vehicle speed value.

OK:
Vehicle speed matches tester speed value.

When not using hand-held tester:
PREPARATION:
Disconnect the connector from Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK: N B
Check resistance between terminals SP2 and SP2 of Engine
and ECT ECU.
OK:
Resistance: 560 - 680 Q at20 °C (68 °F)
D01660

OK Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN-35).
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2 | Check No.2 speed sensor.

PREPARATION:

Remove the No.2 speed sensor from the transmission.

CHECK:

(@ Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of No.2
speed sensor.

(b) Check voltage between terminals 1 and 2 of No.2 speed
sensor when a magnet is put close to the front end of the
No.2 speed sensor then taken away quickly.

(a) Resistance: 560 - 680 Q at 20 °C (68 °F)
(b) Voltage is generated intermittently.
HINT:
The voltage generated is extremely low.

Q08218

NG> Replace the No.2 speed sensor.

Check and repair the harness and connector
between Engine and ECT ECU and No.2
speed sensor (See page IN-35).
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